src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_VIIRRÂM !!= * @CODE@ viirrâm:viirrâm
+A+Attr:%^RmVow%>õs FINAL1 ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VIIRRÂM ;

LEXICON A_KÅÅDDAS !!= * @CODE@ kååddas:kåådd
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:az N_KÅÅDDAS ;

LEXICON A_VEEIDAS !!= * @CODE@ veeidas:veidd
+A+Attr:sõs FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:az N_PÄÄLKAS ;


LEXICON A_SPÄʹSSEB !!= * @CODE@ späʹsseb:späʹsseb
+A+Attr:%^RmVow%>õs FINAL1 ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SPÄʹSSEB ;



LEXICON A_KÄÄʹMES  !!= * @CODE@ kääʹmes:kämm
+A+Attr:%^V2VV%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:ez N_ÅÅʹVES ; !!= * @CODE@   kääʹmes:kämmez

LEXICON A_KÄÄʹLLES  !!= * @CODE@ kääʹlles:käll
+A+Attr:%^V2VV%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:ez NMN_KÄÄʹLLES ; !!= * @CODE@   kääʹmes:kämmez

LEXICON A_KÅÅʹŠǨES !!= * @CODE@ kååʹšǩes:kåškk
+A+Attr:%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:ez NMN_KÄÄʹRBES ;

LEXICON A_ǨEEʹLES  !!= * @CODE@ ǩeeʹles:ǩeâlˈl
+A+Attr:%^PAL FINAL1 ; !CHECKME
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:ez N_ǨEEʹLES ; !!= * @CODE@	ǩeeʹles:ǩeâlˈlez

LEXICON A_PUÄʹRES  !!= * @CODE@ puäʹres:puärˈr
+A+Attr:%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:ez N_PUÄʹRES ; !!= * @CODE@   puäʹres:puärˈrez

LEXICON A_ČUEʹĐES  !!= * @CODE@ čueʹđes:čuâtˈt
+A+Attr:%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:ez N_ČUEʹĐES ; !!= * @CODE@   puäʹres:puärˈrez


LEXICON A_TUÕĐŠTEEI !!= * @CODE@ tuejjeei:tuejjee
+A+Sg+Nom:i FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:i FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
+A+Der/MWN: N_TUÕĐŠTEEI ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

!! WORK HERE 2015-10-14 deverbals
LEXICON A_CÕGGI !!= * @CODE@ cõggi:cõggi
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ; 
+A+Der/MWN: N_CÕGGI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_JÕÕVVI !!= * @CODE@ jõõvvi:jõõvvi
!! ** Yaml: __A-vaeaezhzh__
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JÕÕVVI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_LOOKKI !!= * @CODE@ lookki:lookki
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_LOOKKI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_TOBDDI !!= * @CODE@ tobddi:tobddi
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_TOBDDI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_ǨIÕSSI !!= * @CODE@ ǩiõssi:ǩiõssi
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ǨIÕSSI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_VUÕLLI !!= * @CODE@ vuõlli:vuõlli
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VUÕLLI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_SUÕSKKI !!= * @CODE@ kuõskki:kuõskki
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
+A+Der/MWN: N_SUÕSKKI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_KÅČČAI !!= * @CODE@ kåččai:kåččai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_KÅČČAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PEELLAI !!= * @CODE@ peellai:peellai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PEELLAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PÅÅSSAI !!= * @CODE@ pååssai:pååssai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_PÅÅSSAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_SÄRNNAI !!= * @CODE@ särnnai:särnnai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SÄRNNAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_VUEJJAI !!= * @CODE@ vuejjai:vuejjai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VUEJJAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_REÄKKAI !!= * @CODE@ reäkkai:reäkkai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_REÄKKAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_VUÄGˈGAI !!= * @CODE@ vuäggai:vuägˈgai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VUÄGˈGAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_MEÄLTTAI !!= * @CODE@ meälttai:meälttai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_MEÄLTTAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_ŽẸẸVAI !!= * @CODE@ žeevai:žẹẹvai
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ŽẸẸVAI ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_JOOʹTTI !!= * @CODE@ jooʹtti:jooʹtti
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JOOʹTTI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_OOʹCCI !!= * @CODE@ ooʹcci:ooʹcci
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_OOʹCCI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_JÅÅRǤLÕʹTTI !!= * @CODE@ jåårǥlõʹtti:jåårǥlõʹtti
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JÅÅRǤLÕʹTTI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_ÄJJNÕʹSTTI !!= * @CODE@ äjjnõʹstti:äjjnõʹstti
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ÄJJNÕʹSTTI ;
LEXICON A_SIʹRDDI !!= * @CODE@ siʹrddi:siʹrddi
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SIʹRDDI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_SUʹVDDI !!= * @CODE@ suʹvddi:suʹvddi
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SUʹVDDI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_JIEʹLLI !!= * @CODE@ jieʹlli:jieʹlli
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JIEʹLLI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_LIEʹĐˈĐI !!= * @CODE@ lieʹđđi:lieʹđˈđi
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_LIEʹĐˈĐI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_VUEʹSTTI !!= * @CODE@ vueʹstti:vueʹstti
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VUEʹSTTI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_ǨIÕʹLDDI !!= * @CODE@ ǩiõʹlddi:ǩiõʹlddi
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ǨIÕʹLDDI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_VUÕIʹNNI !!= * @CODE@ vuõiʹnni:vuõiʹnni
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VUÕIʹNNI ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_JUURD !!= * @CODE@ juurd:jurdd
+A+Sg+Nom:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_JUURD ;


LEXICON A_SLOOHMAN
!! !!2. WORDS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 252)
!! !!2.3 Sg.Loc in -est. e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!2.3.2 Sg.Ill in -a
!! !!2.3.2.2 LACKS Gradation
!! !!2.3.2.2.1 Second syllable vowel loss (Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com; Ess, Par; Pl.Gen, Pl.Acc, Pl.Ill, Pl.Loc, Pl.Com, Pl.Abe)
!! ** Yaml: __A-sloohman__
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_SLOOHMAN ;

LEXICON A_RADIO 
!! check this 2015-11-10
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_RADIO ;

LEXICON A_ČÂÂʹLMTEʹM
!! !!2. WORDS WITH MULTI-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 293)
!! !!2.3 Sg.Loc in -est. e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!2.3.2 Sg.Ill in -a
!! !!2.3.2.1 Has Gradation 
!! !!2.3.2.1.1 Second syllable vowel loss (Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com; Ess, Par; Pl.Obl)
!!NumContLex="650"
!! ** Yaml: __A-chaalmtem__
+A: AdjAttr-es ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ČÂÂʹLMTEʹM ;

LEXICON A_NALLŠEM
!! !!2. WORDS WITH MULTI-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 293)
!! !!2.3 Sg.Loc in -est. e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!2.3.2 Sg.Ill in -a
!! !!2.3.2.1 Has Gradation 
!! !!2.3.2.1.1 Second syllable vowel loss (Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com; Ess, Par; Pl.Obl)
!!NumContLex="650"
!! ** Yaml: __A-nallshem__
+A: AdjAttr-es ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_NALLŠEM ;


LEXICON A1a 
!+A+Pred+Sg:%^VOWL%^CXLong # ; 
+A+Pred+Pl: # ; 
+A: AdjAttr-as ; 
+A: AdjDerComp ; 
+A: AdjDerSuperl-mos ; 

LEXICON A40a
+A+Pred+Sg: # ; 
+A+Pred+Pl: # ; 
+A: AdjAttr-as ; 
+A: AdjDerComp ; 
+A: AdjDerSuperl-mos ; 

LEXICON A1â 
+A+Pred+Sg:%^VOWSH%^CLong # ; 
+A+Pred+Pl: # ; 
+A: AdjAttr-âs ; 
+A: AdjDerComp ; 
+A: AdjDerSuperl-mos ; 

LEXICON A1e 
+A+Pred+Sg:%^VOWSH%^CLong # ;
+A+Pred+Pl: # ; 
+A: AdjAttr-es ; 
+A: AdjDerComp ; 
+A: AdjDerSuperl-mos ; 

LEXICON A40e
+A+Pred+Sg: # ; 
+A+Pred+Pl: # ; 
+A: AdjAttr-es ; 
+A: AdjDerComp ; 
+A: AdjDerSuperl-mos ; 

LEXICON A4a
!+A+Pred+Sg:%^as # ; !!WK stem grade
!+A+Pred+Pl:%^as # ; !!WK stem grade
+A: AdjAttr-Ø ; 
+A:%^s AdjDerComp ; 
+A:%^su AdjDerSuperl-mus ; 

LEXICON A4â
!! iisâs:ijss
!! * Yaml: __A-iisas__
!! are the ideas +A+Pred+Sg synonymous with +A+Der/NMW+N+Sg+Nom
!! Sg Nom weak grade 
!! Elsewhere extra strong grade
!+A+Pred+Sg:%^VOWXL%^CShort%^âs # ; 
+A+Pred+Sg:%^VOWXL%^CShort%>âs # ; 
+A+Pred+Pl:%^âz # ; 
+A: AdjAttr-Ø ; 
!+A:%^s AdjDerComp ; 
+A:%>s AdjDerComp ; 
!+A:%^su AdjDerSuperl-mus ; 
+A:%>su AdjDerSuperl-mus ; 
+A: AdjNom-as ;

LEXICON A4e
!+A+Pred+Sg:%^VOWL%^CShort # ; !!WK stem grade
!+A+Pred+Pl:es # ; !!WK stem grade
+A+Attr: # ;
!+A+Comp:%^VOWL%^PALNo%^CLong%^s»ab # ; !!NPAL
!+A+Superl:%^s»ummus # ; !!NPAL

!LEXICON A8 ?does not work at all
!+A: AdjAttr-os ; !!VDEL
!+A+Comp:%^l»ab # ; !!NPAL
!+A+Superl:%^l»ummus # ; !!NPAL

!! CLASS 11 ADJECTIVES
LEXICON A_ŠIÂLGGÂD !!= * @CODE@ šiâlggâd:šiâlgg
+A:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL AdjAttr-es ;
+A:âd SG-NOM ;
+A:âd PL-NOM ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VISKKÂD ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

!LEXICON A_ŠÕLLÂD 
!! šõllâd:šõll
!+A:%^PAL AdjAttr-es ;
!+A:âd SG-NOM ;
!+A:âd PL-NOM ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_VISKKÂD ;
!+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
!+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_VISKKÂD !!= * @CODE@ viskkâd:viskk
+A:%^PAL AdjAttr-es ;
+A:âd SG-NOM ;
+A:âd PL-NOM ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_VISKKÂD ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


LEXICON A_MÅŠŠAD !!= * @CODE@ måššad:måšš
+A: AdjAttr-es ;
+A:ad SG-NOM ;
+A:ad PL-NOM ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_MÅŠŠAD ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


LEXICON A_ÂʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ âʹǩǩed:âʹǩǩ
+A: AdjAttr-es ;
+A:ed SG-NOM ;
+A:ed PL-NOM ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ÂʹǨǨED ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


LEXICON A11
+A+Pred:âd # ; 
+A+Attr:%>es # ; !!PAL
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ; 
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ; 

LEXICON A20
+A+Pred+Pl: # ; 
+A+Comp:»ab # ; 
+A+Superl:»mõs # ; 

LEXICON A_SÄʹMMLAŽ
!! säʹmmlaž:säʹmml
+A+Attr:až K ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A+Der/MWN:  N_SÄʹMMLAŽ ;



LEXICON A30
!+A: # ; same form
+A+Comp:»ab # ; !!NPAL
+A+Superl:»ummus # ; !!NPAL

LEXICON DenominalAdjsCShort
+Der/teʹm:»teʹm A_ČÂÂʹLMTEʹM ;
!+Der/A+Pred+Sg:»teʹm # ;
!+Der/A+Pred+Pl:»teʹm # ;
!+Der/A:»teʹm AdjAttr-es ; ! 2013-09-19 the +Attr removed to avoid double tags
+Der/t+A:»t AdjDerComp ; ! 2013-09-19 the +Comp removed to avoid double tags
+Der/t+A:»t AdjDerSuperl-ummus ; ! 2013-09-19 the +Superl removed to avoid double tags

LEXICON AdjAttr-Ø
+Attr:%^ # ;

LEXICON AdjAttr-as
+Attr:%>as # ; 

LEXICON AdjAttr-âs
+Attr:%>âs # ; 

LEXICON AdjAttr-es
+Attr:%>es # ; 

LEXICON AdjAttr-os
+Attr:%>õs # ; 

LEXICON AdjDerComp
+Comp:»ab # ; 
